Hawaii statutes.
§39A‑33 Compliance with state and
local law. The issuance of special purpose revenue bonds with respect to
any project under this part shall not relieve any project party or other user
of such project from the laws, ordinances, and rules and regulations of the
State or any political subdivision thereof, or any departments or boards
thereof with respect to the construction, operation, and maintenance of
projects, compliance with health care planning laws or regulations, or zoning
laws or regulations, obtaining of building permits, compliance with building
and health codes and other laws, ordinances, or rules and regulations of
similar nature pertaining to the project, and such laws shall be applicable to
such party or such other user to the same extent it would be if the costs of
the project were directly financed by the project party. [L 1980, c 255, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next